Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 24 Blood Labeling

Cross references.

Inapplicability of implied warranties to injection, transfusion, or other transfer of blood, blood plasma, or transplanting of tissue, bones, or organs, §§

11-2-316

,

51-1-28

.

Methods for selection of blood donors and collection of blood, §

31-22-5

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Blood labeling, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-9.

31-24-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Blood Labeling Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 1.

31-24-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Blood” means whole human blood, packed red blood cells, blood platelets, concentrated leucocytes, and blood plasma. It does not include blood derivatives manufactured or processed for industrial use.

“Donation” means any transaction involving the person from whom blood is withdrawn, whether he presents himself for the withdrawal of blood on his own initiative or on the initiative of another person, in which he receives no consideration other than credit through blood assurance programs or other intangible benefits.

“Industrial use” means a use of blood in which the blood is modified by physical or chemical means to produce derivatives for therapeutic or pharmaceutic biologicals and laboratory reagents or controls.

“Person” means any individual, blood bank, clinical laboratory, hospital, firm, corporation, or any other entity.

“Purchase” means any transaction involving the person from whom blood is withdrawn, whether he presents himself for the withdrawal of blood on his own initiative or on the initiative of another person, in which he receives a monetary consideration in any form. Time off from work granted by an employer for the purpose of giving blood shall not be considered a direct monetary consideration.

“Transfusion” means a use of blood in which the blood is administered to a human being for treatment of sickness or injury.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 2.

31-24-3.
Requirement of qualification of blood donors.

No blood may be withdrawn from any individual in this state for transfusion or industrial uses unless he qualifies to be a blood donor under the laws of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 3.

Cross references.

Age at which person may donate blood without consent of parent or guardian, §

44-5-89

.

31-24-4.
Labeling of containers of blood.

Every person who withdraws blood from an individual or separates blood into components by physical processes shall affix to each container of such blood or components a label in a form specified by the Department of Public Health which shall include an indication of whether the blood was obtained by purchase or donation.

The director of any blood bank who obtains blood in this state from a federally licensed blood bank in another state may label such blood as donated blood if he can legally certify to that fact. If he cannot make such certification, he shall label the blood as blood acquired by purchase.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-24-5.
Transfusion of unlabeled blood; identification of blood administered by transfusion.

No person may administer blood by transfusion in this state or transfer or offer to transfer blood for transfusion purposes by any type of transaction unless the container of such blood is labeled as required by Code Section 31-24-4.

When blood is administered by transfusion in this state, the identification number of the unit of blood shall be recorded in the patient’s medical record, and the label on the container of such blood may not be removed before or during the administration of that blood by transfusion.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 5.

31-24-6.
Transfer of blood and blood components for industrial use.

Blood and blood components, including salvage plasma, may be used and transferred for industrial uses without regard to whether its original acquisition was by purchase or donation.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 6.

31-24-7.
Administration of chapter.

The department shall administer this chapter as a part of and using the procedures of Chapter 22 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 7.

31-24-8.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 353, § 8.